Mississippi statutes. Title 7. Executive Department
Special Treasury Fund

§§ 7-9-55 through 7-9-61.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1985, ch. 419, § 4, eff from and after November 4, 1986, the date upon which the electorate ratified the addition of Section 206A to the Mississippi Constitution of 1890 which was proposed by Laws, 1985, ch. 546.

§7-9-55. [En Laws, 1982, ch. 495, § 1]

§7-9-57. [En Laws, 1982, ch. 495, § 2]

§7-9-59. [En Laws, 1982, ch. 495, § 3; Am 1984, ch. 488, § 164]

§7-9-61. [En Laws, 1982, ch. 495, § 4]

§ 7-9-63.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1995, ch. 622, § 23, eff from and after July 1, 1995.

§7-9-63. [Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 286; Laws, 1985, ch. 525, § 12]

§ 7-9-64.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1992, ch. 419, § 33, eff from and after July 1, 1992, and by Laws, 1993, ch. 509, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

§7-9-64. [Laws, 1988, ch. 487, § 13; Laws, 1992, ch. 484, § 6]

§§ 7-9-65 through 7-9-69.
Repealed.

Repealed from and after November 4, 1986, the date upon which the electorate ratified the addition of Section 206A to the Mississippi Constitution of 1890 which was proposed by Laws, 1985, ch. 546.

§§7-9-65 through7-9-69. [En Laws, 1986, ch. 436, §§ 1-3]

§ 7-9-70.
Mississippi Fire Fighters Memorial Burn Center Fund established; deposits; investments; Mississippi Burn Care Fund.

There is created and established in the State Treasury a special trust fund to be known as the “Mississippi Fire Fighters Memorial Burn Center Fund.” There shall be deposited in such fund (a) all such fees as the State Treasurer is directed to deposit therein under subsection (4) of Section 27-19-56.1, under subsection (4) of Section 27-19-56.2 and under subsection (5)(b) of Section 27-19-56.4; and (b) any gift, donation, bequest, trust, grant, endowment, transfer of money or securities or any other monies from any source whatsoever as may be designated for deposit in the fund.

The principal of the trust fund created under subsection (1) of this section shall remain inviolate and shall be invested as provided by law. Interest and income derived from investment of the principal of the trust fund may be appropriated by the Legislature and expended exclusively for the support and maintenance of the Mississippi Fire Fighters Memorial Burn Center.

From and after June 17, 2005, there shall be created in the State Treasury a fund known as the Mississippi Burn Care Fund. The Mississippi Burn Care Fund shall be the Mississippi Fire Fighters Memorial Burn Center Fund and any reference to the Mississippi Fire Fighters Memorial Burn Center Fund in law shall mean the Mississippi Burn Care Fund. All funds payable to the Mississippi Fire Fighters Memorial Burn Center Fund shall, from and after June 17, 2005, be paid to the Mississippi Burn Care Fund. All balances in the Mississippi Fire Fighters Memorial Burn Center Fund and the Mississippi Fire Fighters Memorial Fire Fighters Burn Center Escrow Fund shall be transferred to the Mississippi Burn Care Fund on June 17, 2005. All interest earned by funds in the Mississippi Burn Care Fund shall be credited to the fund and not the General Fund. For fiscal year 2006, and for each fiscal year thereafter, the Legislature may appropriate interest, income or other funds credited to the Mississippi Burn Care Fund, and there shall be no requirement that the monies deposited to the fund be held inviolate in trust. Any appropriation of funds from the Mississippi Burn Care Fund shall be to the Mississippi Department of Health for the purpose of carrying out its responsibilities established in Section 41-59-5; however, after the Mississippi Burn Center established at the University of Mississippi Medical Center under Section 37-115-45 is operational, any appropriation of funds from the Mississippi Burn Care Fund shall be to the University of Mississippi Medical Center for the operation of the Mississippi Burn Center. The Mississippi Burn Care Fund shall be authorized to accept gifts, donations, bequests, appropriations or other grants from any source, governmental or private, for deposit into the fund. The Department of Health, or the University of Mississippi Medical Center after the Mississippi Burn Center is operational, shall be the agency responsible for receiving any such gifts, donations, bequests, appropriations or grants and shall deposit such to the Mississippi Burn Care Fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1992, ch. 501, § 1; Laws, 2005, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 47, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 569, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2007.